Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2676YC (1) 91 jm/md H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 403.5, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 6A. An urban renewal plan adopted or 3 amended on or after the effective date of this Act shall not 4 include an urban renewal project related to property upon which 5 a licensee, issued a license under chapter 99F on or after 6 January 1, 2025, operates, and the urban renewal area shall not 7 include the property upon which such a licensee operates. 8 Sec. 2. Section 403.6, subsection 19, Code 2025, is amended 9 by adding the following new paragraph: 10 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. Notwithstanding any other provision to 11 the contrary, an assessment agreement entered into on or after 12 the effective date of this Act involving property upon which 13 a licensee, issued a license under chapter 99F on or after 14 January 1, 2025, will operate, shall establish the minimum 15 actual value of the land and completed improvements made on the 16 land at an amount not less than the project cost presented to 17 the state racing and gaming commission as part of the license 18 approval. 19 Sec. 3. Section 403.19, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 20 2025, is amended to read as follows: 21 a. That portion of the taxes each year in excess of such 22 amount shall be allocated to and when collected be paid into a 23 special fund of the municipality to pay the principal of and 24 interest on loans, moneys advanced to, or indebtedness, whether 25 funded, refunded, assumed, or otherwise, including bonds 26 issued under the authority of section 403.9, subsection 1 , 27 incurred by the municipality to finance or refinance, in whole 28 or in part, an urban renewal project within the area, and to 29 provide assistance for low and moderate income family housing 30 as provided in section 403.22 . However, except as provided 31 in paragraph âbâ , taxes for the regular and voter-approved 32 physical plant and equipment levy of a school district imposed 33 pursuant to section 298.2 and taxes for the instructional 34 support program of a school district imposed pursuant to 35 -1- LSB 2676YC (1) 91 jm/md 1/ 3 H.F. _____ section 257.19 , taxes for the payment of bonds and interest of 1 each taxing district, taxes levied against property upon which 2 a licensee, issued a license under chapter 99F on or after 3 January 1, 2025, operates, and taxes imposed under section 4 346.27, subsection 22 , related to joint county-city buildings 5 shall be collected against all taxable property within the 6 taxing district without limitation by the provisions of this 7 subsection . 8 Sec. 4. Section 404.3C, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 9 by adding the following new paragraph: 10 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. Notwithstanding any other provision to 11 the contrary, an assessment agreement entered into on or after 12 the effective date of this Act, involving property upon which 13 a licensee, issued a license under chapter 99F on or after 14 January 1, 2025, will operate, shall establish the minimum 15 actual value of the land and completed improvements made on the 16 land at an amount not less than the project cost presented to 17 the state racing and gaming commission as part of the license 18 approval. 19 Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 20 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 21 Sec. 6. APPLICABILITY. The following applies to property 22 taxes due and payable in fiscal years beginning on or after 23 July 1, 2025: 24 The section of this Act amending section 403.19. 25